test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-muuttumaton_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ihminen - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'unchangeable' - ei tsekattu
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Nom: muuttumaton
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Gen: muuttumattoman
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Par: muuttumatonta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Tra: muuttumattomaksi
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Abe: muuttumattomatta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Ine: muuttumattomassa
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Ela: muuttumattomasta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Ill: muuttumattomhaan
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Ade: muuttumattomalla
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Abl: muuttumattomalta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+All: muuttumattomalle
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Ess: muuttumattomana
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Nom: muuttumattomat
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Gen: muuttumattomiin
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Par: muuttumattomiita
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Tra: muuttumattomiksi
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Abe: muuttumattomitta
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Ine: muuttumattomissa
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Ela: muuttumattomista
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Ill: muuttumattomhiin
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Ade: muuttumattomilla
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Abl: muuttumattomilta
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+All: muuttumattomille
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Ess: muuttumattominna
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Com: muuttumattomine
     
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Nom: muuttumattomampi
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Gen: muuttumattomamman
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Par: muuttumattomamppaa
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Tra: muuttumattomammaksi
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Abe: muuttumattomammatta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Ine: muuttumattomammassa
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Ela: muuttumattomammasta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Ill: muuttumattomamphaan
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Ade: muuttumattomammala
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Abl: muuttumattomammalta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+All: muuttumattomammale
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Comp+Ess: muuttumattomampana
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Nom: muuttumattomammat
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Gen: muuttumattomamppiin
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Par: muuttumattomamppii
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Tra: muuttumattomammiksi
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Abe: muuttumattomammitta
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Ine: muuttumattomammissa
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Ela: muuttumattomammista
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Ill: muuttumattomamphiin
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Ade: muuttumattomammila
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Abl: muuttumattomammilta
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+All: muuttumattomammile
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Ess: muuttumattomampina
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Comp+Com: muuttumattomampine
     
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: muuttumattomin
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: muuttumattomimman
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Par: muuttumattominta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: muuttumattomimmaksi
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: muuttumattomimmatta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: muuttumattomimmassa
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: muuttumattomimmasta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: muuttumattomimphaan
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: muuttumattomimmala
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: muuttumattomimmalta
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+All: muuttumattomimmale
     muuttumaton+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: muuttumattomimpana
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: muuttumattomimmat
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: muuttumattomimppiin
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Par: muuttumattomimppii
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: muuttumattomimmiksi
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: muuttumattomimmitta
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: muuttumattomimmissa
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: muuttumattomimmista
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: muuttumattomimphiin
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: muuttumattomimmila
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: muuttumattomimmilta
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+All: muuttumattomimmile
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: muuttumattomimpina
     muuttumaton+A+Pl+Superl+Com: muuttumattomimpine
